Colorado statutes. TITLE 35 Agriculture
ARTICLE 8
WEEDS

35-8-101 to 35-8-107. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 77:

Entire article repealed, p. 293, § 10, effective May 26.

Editor's note:

This article was numbered as article 9 of chapter 6, C.R.S. 1963. For amendments to this article prior to its repeal in 1977, consult the Colorado statutory research explanatory note and the table itemizing the replacement volumes and supplements to the original volume of C.R.S. 1973 beginning on page vii in the front of this volume.